Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 2515XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 280 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0r. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 279.87 related to the adoption of 4 policies related to awarding students academic credit for the 5 completion of a course in religious instruction in the same 6 manner as a school district. 7 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 10 requirements of section 279.87 related to the adoption of 11 policies related to awarding students academic credit for the 12 completion of a course in religious instruction in the same 13 manner as a school district. 14 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Academic credit for completion 15 of courses in religious instruction. 16 1. The board of directors of a school district may adopt 17 a policy related to awarding students academic credit for 18 the completion of a course in religious instruction that is 19 provided by a private organization pursuant to section 299.1D. 20 2. a. A policy adopted by the board of directors of a 21 school district pursuant to subsection 1 must prohibit the 22 school district from considering the religious content included 23 in the course in religious instruction, and the denominational 24 affiliation of the course in religious instruction, when 25 determining whether the course in religious instruction meets 26 the education program requirement pertaining to any unit under 27 section 256.11, subsection 5. 28 b. A policy adopted by the board of directors of a school 29 district pursuant to subsection 1 must require the school 30 district to do all of the following when determining whether 31 the course in religious instruction meets the education program 32 requirement pertaining to any unit under section 256.11, 33 subsection 5: 34 (1) Consider the number of hours of classroom instruction 35 -1- LSB 2515XS (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 280 time provided to the student under the course in religious 1 instruction, the methods of assessment used in the course in 2 religious instruction, and the qualifications of the instructor 3 who provided instruction under the course in religious 4 instruction. 5 (2) Review the syllabus associated with the course in 6 religious instruction and any materials provided to the student 7 as part of the course in religious instruction. 8 Sec. 4. Section 299.1, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 2025, 9 is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 10 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) While attending a course in religious 11 instruction pursuant to section 299.1D. 12 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 299.1D Absences related to courses in 13 religious instruction. 14 1. Section 299.1 shall not apply to a child while the child 15 is attending a course in religious instruction that is provided 16 by a private organization if all of the following requirements 17 are satisfied: 18 a. The childâs parent, guardian, or legal or actual 19 custodian of the child, if the child is not an emancipated 20 minor, or the child, if the child is an emancipated minor, 21 must submit a notification to the public school or accredited 22 nonpublic school informing the school that the child will 23 attend a course in religious instruction during the school day. 24 b. The course in religious instruction must not require the 25 child to be absent from school for more than five hours per 26 week. 27 c. The private organization that provides the course in 28 religious instruction must maintain attendance records and must 29 make the attendance records available to the school district 30 or accredited nonpublic school to verify when the child is 31 attending a course in religious instruction. 32 d. Transportation related to the course in religious 33 instruction must be provided by the private organization, the 34 childâs parent, guardian, or legal or actual custodian, or the 35 -2- LSB 2515XS (1) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 280 child. 1 e. The private organization must make provisions for and 2 assume liability for the child while the child is attending the 3 course in religious instruction. 4 f. The school district or accredited nonpublic school 5 must not expend any moneys related to the course in religious 6 instruction, not including de minimis administrative costs 7 associated with processing notifications received under 8 subsection 1 and tracking the childâs attendance to ensure 9 compliance with this section. 10 g. The course in religious instruction must not be held 11 on school district property unless authorized by the board of 12 directors of the school district pursuant to section 297.9. 13 h. The child must agree to make up any school work that the 14 child does not complete while attending the course in religious 15 instruction. 16 2. A childâs parent, guardian, or legal or actual custodian 17 of the child, if the child is not an emancipated minor, or the 18 child, if the child is an emancipated minor, who alleges that 19 a school district has violated this section may bring a civil 20 action for injunctive relief and actual damages against the 21 school district. If the childâs parent, guardian, or legal or 22 actual custodian, or the child, is the prevailing party in a 23 civil action instituted pursuant to this subsection, the court 24 shall award reasonable court costs and attorney fees to the 25 childâs parent, guardian, or legal or actual custodian, or the 26 child, as applicable. 27 Sec. 6. Section 299.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 28 following new subsection: 29 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. While attending a course in religious 30 instruction pursuant to section 299.1D. 31 Sec. 7. Section 299.12, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 32 2025, is amended to read as follows: 33 a. âChronically absentâ means any absence from school for 34 more than ten percent of the days or hours in the grading 35 -3- LSB 2515XS (1) 91 jda/jh 3/ 5 S.F. 280 period established by a public school ; provided, however, that 1 an absence from school that is related to attending a course 2 in religious instruction pursuant to section 299.1D shall not 3 count toward this amount . 4